nl: Rem onderhoudsset inbegrepen onderdelen: Ontluchtingsfles; Ontluchtingssleutel; Remleidingbuiger; Felsgereedschap voor remleidingen; Remblokspreider; Terugstelgereedschap remzuiger; Remklauwspreider; Draagkoffer; Opvangfles; Transparante ontluchtingsslang; Remverentang; Handvacuümpomp; Borgveergereedschap; Leidingklemmen/afknijpklemmen; Eenrichtingsterugslagklep; Drukontluchtingstank; Drukmeter; Reservoirvuldopadapters; Terugstelplaten/-adapters; Universele reservoiradapter; Overig
sl-SI: Vključene komponente kompleta za servis zavor: Posoda za odzračevanje; Ključ za odzračevalni vijak; Krivilnik za zavorne cevi; Orodje za robljenje zavornih cevi; Orodje za razmikanje zavornih ploščic; Orodje za vračanje batov zavornih čeljusti; Orodje za razmikanje zavornih čeljusti; Prenosna torba; Posoda za prestrezanje; Prozorna cev za odzračevanje; Klešče za vzmeti bobnastih zavor; Ročna vakuumska črpalka; Orodje za zadrževalno vzmet; Sponke za cevi/stiskalne sponke; Enosmerni protipovratni ventil; Tlačna posoda za odzračevanje; Manometer; Adapterji za pokrovček rezervoarja; Plošče za vračanje batov/adapterji; Univerzalni adapter rezervoarja; Drugo
fi: Jarrujen huoltopakkauksen sisältyvät osat: Ilmauspullo; Ilmausruuviavain; Jarruputken taivutin; Jarruputken kartiointityökalu; Jarrupalojen levitin; Jarrumännän palautustyökalu; Jarrusatulan levitin; Kantolaukku; Keräyspullo; Läpinäkyvä ilmausletku; Rumpujarrun jousipihdit; Käsikäyttöinen alipainepumppu; Pidikejousityökalu; Letkupuristimet/linjapuristimet; Yksisuuntainen takaiskuventtiili; Paineilmaussäiliö; Painemittari; Säiliön korkin sovittimet; Palautuslevyt/sovittimet; Yleiskäyttöinen säiliösovitin; Muu
ja: ブレーキサービスキットの構造コンポーネント付き: ブリーダーボトル; ブリーダースクリューレンチ; ブレーキラインベンダー; ブレーキラインフレアリングツール; ブレーキパッドスプレッダー; キャリパーピストンリワインドツール; キャリパースプレッダーツール; キャリングケース; キャッチボトル; 透明ブリードホース; ドラムブレーキスプリングプライヤー; ハンドバキュームポンプ; ホールドダウンスプリングツール; ラインクランプ/ピンチオフクランプ; ワンウェイチェックバルブ; プレッシャーブリーダータンク; 圧力計; リザーバーキャップアダプター; リワインドプレート/アダプター; ユニバーサルリザーバーアダプター; その他
cs: Obsah servisní sady brzdy je součástí balení: Odvzdušňovací láhev; Klíč na odvzdušňovací šroub; Ohýbačka brzdových trubek; Pertlovací sada na brzdové trubky; Roztahovák brzdových destiček; Nástroj na zatlačení pístku třmenu; Roztahovák třmenů; Přenosné pouzdro; Sběrná láhev; Průhledná odvzdušňovací hadička; Kleště na pružiny bubnových brzd; Ruční vakuová pumpa; Nástroj na přídržné pružiny; Svorky na hadice; Jednosměrný zpětný ventil; Nádrž na tlakové odvzdušnění; Tlakoměr; Adaptéry na víčko nádržky; Zatlačovací desky/adaptéry; Univerzální adaptér na nádržku; Jiné
en: Brake service kit components included: Bleeder bottle; Bleeder screw wrench; Brake line bender; Brake line flaring tool; Brake pad spreader; Caliper piston rewind tool; Caliper spreader tool; Carrying case; Catch bottle; Clear bleed hose; Drum brake spring pliers; Hand vacuum pump; Hold-down spring tool; Line clamps/pinch-off clamps; One-way check valve; Pressure bleeder tank; Pressure gauge; Reservoir cap adapters; Rewind plates/adapters; Universal reservoir adapter; Other
tr: Fren servis kiti dahil bileşenler: Hava alma şişesi; Hava alma anahtarı; Fren borusu bükücü; Fren borusu havşa açma aleti; Fren balatası ayırıcı; Kaliper pistonu geri itme aleti; Kaliper ayırıcı alet; Taşıma çantası; Atık şişesi; Şeffaf hava alma hortumu; Kampana fren yay pensesi; El vakum pompası; Tespit yayı aleti; Boru kelepçeleri/sıkıştırma pensesi; Tek yönlü çek valf; Basınçlı hava alma tankı; Basınç göstergesi; Hazne kapağı adaptörleri; Geri itme plakaları/adaptörleri; Evrensel hazne adaptörü; Diğer
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα κιτ σέρβις φρένων: Φιάλη εξαέρωσης; Κλειδί βίδας εξαέρωσης; Κουρμπαδόρος σωληνώσεων φρένων; Εργαλείο εκχείλωσης σωληνώσεων φρένων; Διαστολέας τακακιών φρένων; Εργαλείο επαναφοράς εμβόλου δαγκάνας; Εργαλείο διαστολέα δαγκάνας; Θήκη μεταφοράς; Φιάλη συλλογής; Διάφανος σωλήνας εξαέρωσης; Πένσα ελατηρίων ταμπούρου; Χειροκίνητη αντλία κενού; Εργαλείο ελατηρίου συγκράτησης; Σφιγκτήρες σωλήνων/σφιγκτήρες αποκοπής; Βαλβίδα αντεπιστροφής (μονής κατεύθυνσης); Δοχείο εξαέρωσης υπό πίεση; Μανόμετρο; Προσαρμογείς καπακιού δοχείου; Πλάκες/προσαρμογείς επαναφοράς; Προσαρμογέας δοχείου γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
bg-BG: Включени компоненти в сервизния комплект за спирачките: Бутилка за обезвъздушаване; Ключ за обезвъздушител; Огъвач за спирачни тръби; Инструмент за развалцоване на спирачни тръби; Разширител за спирачни накладки; Инструмент за прибиране на спирачни бутала; Разширител за спирачни апарати; Куфарче за пренасяне; Събирателна бутилка; Прозрачен маркуч за обезвъздушаване; Клещи за пружини на барабанни спирачки; Ръчна вакуумна помпа; Инструмент за фиксиращи пружини; Скоби за маркучи/прищипващи скоби; Еднопосочен възвратен клапан; Резервоар за обезвъздушаване под налягане; Манометър; Адаптери за капачка на казанчето; Плочи/адаптери за прибиране; Универсален адаптер за казанче; Други
ko: 브레이크 정비 키트 포함 구성품: 블리더 보틀; 블리더 나사 렌치; 브레이크 라인 벤더; 브레이크 라인 플레어링 공구; 브레이크 패드 스프레더; 캘리퍼 피스톤 리와인드 공구; 캘리퍼 스프레더 공구; 휴대용 케이스; 캐치 보틀; 투명 블리드 호스; 드럼 브레이크 스프링 플라이어; 수동 진공 펌프; 홀드 다운 스프링 공구; 라인 클램프/핀치 오프 클램프; 단방향 체크 밸브; 압력 블리더 탱크; 압력 게이지; 리저버 캡 어댑터; 리와인드 플레이트/어댑터; 범용 리저버 어댑터; 기타
vi: Các thành phần trong bộ dụng cụ bảo dưỡng phanh: Bình xả; Cờ lê ốc xả; Dụng cụ uốn ống phanh; Dụng cụ loe ống phanh; Dụng cụ ép má phanh; Dụng cụ xoay ép pít-tông ngàm phanh; Dụng cụ ép ngàm phanh; Hộp đựng; Bình hứng; Ống xả trong suốt; Kìm tháo lò xo phanh trống; Bơm hút chân không cầm tay; Dụng cụ tháo lò xo giữ; Kẹp kìm/kẹp ngắt dòng; Van một chiều; Bình xả áp; Đồng hồ đo áp suất; Bộ nối nắp bình chứa; Tấm đệm/bộ nối xoay ép; Bộ nối bình chứa đa năng; Khác
fr: Composants inclus dans le kit d’entretien des freins: Bouteille de purge; Clé de purge; Cintreuse de tube de frein; Outil à évaser les tubes de frein; Écarteur de plaquettes de frein; Repousse-piston d'étrier; Outil écarteur d'étrier; Mallette de transport; Bouteille de récupération; Tuyau de purge transparent; Pince pour ressort de frein à tambour; Pompe à vide manuelle; Outil pour ressort de maintien; Pinces à durite; Clapet anti-retour; Réservoir de purge sous pression; Manomètre; Adaptateurs pour bouchon de réservoir; Plaques/adaptateurs de repousse-piston; Adaptateur de réservoir universel; Autre
sk-SK: Komponenty v súprave na servis bŕzd: Nádoba na odvzdušňovanie; Kľúč na odvzdušňovaciu skrutku; Ohýbačka brzdových trubiek; Nástroj na pertlovanie brzdových trubiek; Rozťahovák brzdových doštičiek; Nástroj na zatláčanie brzdových piestikov; Nástroj na rozťahovanie strmeňa; Kufrík na prenášanie; Zberná nádoba; Priehľadná odvzdušňovacia hadička; Kliešte na pružiny bubnových bŕzd; Ručná vákuová pumpa; Nástroj na prídržné pružiny; Svorky na hadičky/zaškrcovacie svorky; Jednocestný spätný ventil; Nádoba na tlakové odvzdušňovanie; Tlakomer; Adaptéry na uzáver nádržky; Zatláčacie podložky/adaptéry; Univerzálny adaptér na nádržku; Iné
lt-LT: Įtraukti stabdžių aptarnavimo rinkinio komponentai: Nuorinimo buteliukas; Nuorinimo varžto raktas; Stabdžių linijos lenktuvas; Stabdžių linijos plėstuvas; Stabdžių trinkelių plėstuvas; Apkabos stūmoklio įspaudimo įrankis; Apkabos plėstuvas; Nešiojimo dėklas; Skysčių surinkimo buteliukas; Skaidri nuorinimo žarna; Būgninių stabdžių spyruoklių replės; Rankinė vakuuminė pompa; Tvirtinimo spyruoklių įrankis; Linijos spaustuvai / užspaudėjai; Vienpusis atbulinis vožtuvas; Slėginio nuorintojo bakelis; Manometras; Rezervuaro dangtelio adapteriai; Įspaudimo plokštelės / adapteriai; Universalus rezervuaro adapteris; Kita
pt-BR: Componentes incluídos no kit de manutenção de freio: Frasco para sangria; Chave para parafuso de sangria; Dobrador de tubo de freio; Ferramenta de flangeamento de tubo de freio; Separador de pastilha de freio; Ferramenta de recuo de pistão da pinça; Ferramenta de expansão da pinça; Estojo de transporte; Frasco coletor; Mangueira de sangria transparente; Alicate de mola para freio a tambor; Bomba de vácuo manual; Ferramenta para mola de retenção; Braçadeiras de linha/alicate de estrangulamento; Válvula de retenção unidirecional; Tanque sangrador de pressão; Manômetro; Adaptadores para tampa do reservatório; Placas/adaptadores de recuo; Adaptador universal para reservatório; Outro
zh-CN: 制动维修套件所含组件: 排气瓶; 放气螺丝扳手; 制动管弯管器; 制动管扩口工具; 刹车片撑开器; 卡钳活塞复位工具; 卡钳撑开器; 便携盒; 收集瓶; 透明排气软管; 鼓式刹车弹簧钳; 手动真空泵; 压紧弹簧工具; 管夹/截流夹; 单向止回阀; 加压排气罐; 压力表; 储液罐盖适配器; 复位板/适配器; 通用储液罐适配器; 其他
de: Im Bremsreparatur-Set enthaltene Komponenten: Entlüftungsflasche; Entlüftungsschlüssel; Bremsleitungsbiegegerät; Bremsleitungs-Bördelgerät; Bremsbelagspreizer; Bremskolben-Rückstellwerkzeug; Bremssattel-Spreizwerkzeug; Transportkoffer; Auffangbehälter; Transparenter Entlüftungsschlauch; Trommelbremsfederzange; Handvakuumpumpe; Niederhaltefederwerkzeug; Leitungsklemmen/Abklemmzangen; Einweg-Rückschlagventil; Druckentlüftungstank; Manometer; Behälterdeckel-Adapter; Rückstellplatten/-adapter; Universeller Behälter-Adapter; Sonstige
zh-TW: 包含剎車維修用套件組件: 漏液瓶 (排氣瓶); 排氣螺絲扳手; 煞車管彎管器; 煞車管擴口工具; 來令片撐開器; 卡鉗活塞退回工具; 卡鉗撐開器; 手提箱; 收集瓶; 透明排氣軟管; 鼓煞彈簧鉗; 手動真空泵浦; 壓緊彈簧工具; 管線夾/壓斷夾; 單向閥; 加壓排氣罐; 壓力計; 儲油槽蓋轉接頭; 退回板/轉接頭; 通用型儲油槽轉接頭; 其他
it: Componenti del kit di manutenzione freni inclusi: Flacone di spurgo; Chiave per vite di spurgo; Piegatubi per freni; Svasatore per tubi dei freni; Divaricatore per pastiglie dei freni; Arretratore per pistoncini pinza; Divaricatore per pinze; Custodia per il trasporto; Flacone di raccolta; Tubo di spurgo trasparente; Pinza per molle freni a tamburo; Pompa per il vuoto manuale; Strumento per molle di fissaggio; Morsetti per tubi/pinze strozzatubi; Valvola di non ritorno; Serbatoio per spurgo a pressione; Manometro; Adattatori per tappo serbatoio; Piastre di arretramento/adattatori; Adattatore universale per serbatoio; Altro
es: Componentes del kit de servicio de frenos incluidos: Botella de purgado; Llave de tornillo de purgado; Dobladora de tubos de freno; Herramienta para abocardar tubos de freno; Separador de pastillas de freno; Herramienta de retroceso de pistón de pinza; Herramienta separadora de pinza; Estuche de transporte; Botella de recolección; Manguera transparente para purgado; Alicates para resortes de frenos de tambor; Bomba de vacío manual; Herramienta para resortes de retención; Abrazaderas de manguera/pinzas de estrangulamiento; Válvula de retención unidireccional; Tanque de purgado a presión; Manómetro; Adaptadores de tapa de depósito; Placas de retroceso/adaptadores; Adaptador universal de depósito; Otro
ro-RO: Componentele kitului de service pentru frâne incluse: Sticlă pentru aerisire; Cheie pentru șurub de aerisire; Dispozitiv de îndoire conducte frână; Trusă de bercluit conducte frână; Presă plăcuțe de frână; Trusă de presat pistoane etrier; Presă etrier; Geantă de transport; Sticlă colectoare; Furtun transparent de aerisire; Clește pentru arcuri tambur; Pompă de vacuum manuală; Dispozitiv pentru arcuri de fixare; Cleme pentru conducte / cleme de strangulare; Supapă de sens; Rezervor de aerisire sub presiune; Manometru; Adaptoare pentru capacul rezervorului; Plăcuțe/adaptoare de presare; Adaptor universal pentru rezervor; Altele
th: รายการส่วนประกอบที่รวมอยู่ในชุดซ่อมบำรุงเบรก: ขวดไล่ลม; ประแจขันสกรูไล่ลม; เครื่องดัดท่อเบรก; เครื่องมือบานปลายท่อเบรก; เครื่องมือถ่างผ้าเบรก; เครื่องมือดันลูกสูบคาลิปเปอร์กลับ; เครื่องมือถ่างคาลิปเปอร์; กล่องพกพา; ขวดรองรับของเหลว; สายไล่ลมใส; คีมหนีบสปริงดรัมเบรก; ปั๊มสุญญากาศแบบใช้มือ; เครื่องมือถอดสปริงยึดผ้าเบรก; แคลมป์รัดท่อ/แคลมป์หนีบท่อ; เช็ควาล์วทางเดียว; ถังไล่ลมด้วยแรงดัน; เกจวัดแรงดัน; อะแดปเตอร์ฝากระปุกน้ำมันเบรก; แผ่นดึงกลับ/อะแดปเตอร์; อะแดปเตอร์กระปุกน้ำมันเบรกอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
ru: Компоненты комплекта для обслуживания тормозов: Емкость для прокачки; Ключ для штуцера прокачки; Трубогиб для тормозных магистралей; Инструмент для вальцовки тормозных трубок; Распорка тормозных колодок; Инструмент для вдавливания поршня суппорта; Инструмент для разведения суппортов; Футляр для переноски; Емкость для сбора жидкости; Прозрачный шланг для прокачки; Щипцы для пружин барабанных тормозов; Ручной вакуумный насос; Инструмент для прижимных пружин; Зажимы для магистралей/пережимные клещи; Обратный клапан; Бачок для прокачки под давлением; Манометр; Адаптеры для крышки бачка; Пластины/адаптеры для вдавливания поршней; Универсальный адаптер для бачка; Другое
nb: Bremseservicesettkomponenter inkludert: Lufteflaske; Luftenøkkel; Rørbøyer for bremserør; Koningsverktøy for bremserør; Bremsekloss-spreder; Tilbakestillingsverktøy for kaliperstempel; Kaliper-spreder; Bæreveske; Oppsamlingsflaske; Gjennomsiktig lufteslange; Fjærtang for trommelbrems; Håndvakuumpumpe; Monteringsverktøy for holdefjær; Slangeklemmer/klemmer; Enveis tilbakeslagsventil; Trykkluftingstank; Trykkmåler; Beholderlokk-adaptere; Tilbakestillingsplater/-adaptere; Universell beholderadapter; Annet
pl: Elementy zestawu serwisowego hamulców w zestawie: Butelka do odpowietrzania; Klucz do odpowietrzników; Giętarka do przewodów hamulcowych; Przyrząd do zarabiania przewodów hamulcowych; Rozpieracz klocków hamulcowych; Przyrząd do wciskania tłoczków hamulcowych; Narzędzie do rozpierania zacisków; Walizka transportowa; Butelka zlewcza; Przezroczysty wężyk do odpowietrzania; Szczypce do sprężyn hamulców bębnowych; Ręczna pompa próżniowa; Narzędzie do sprężyn dociskowych; Zaciski przewodów/szczypce zaciskowe; Zawór zwrotny; Zbiornik ciśnieniowy do odpowietrzania; Manometr; Adaptery do korków zbiornika; Płytki/adaptery do wciskania tłoczków; Uniwersalny adapter do zbiornika; Inne
hu: Fékszerviz-készlet mellékelt elemei: Légtelenítő tartály; Légtelenítő csavarkulcs; Fékcsőhajlító; Fékcsőperemező szerszám; Fékbetét-feszítő; Fékdugattyú-visszanyomó szerszám; Féknyereg-feszítő szerszám; Hordozótáska; Felfogó tartály; Átlátszó légtelenítő cső; Dobfékrugó-fogó; Kézi vákuumpumpa; Tartórugó-szerszám; Csőszorító/elzáró fogó; Egyirányú visszacsapó szelep; Túlnyomásos légtelenítő tartály; Nyomásmérő; Tartálysapka-adapterek; Visszanyomó lapok/adapterek; Univerzális tartályadapter; Egyéb
sv: Komponenter till bromsservicekit som ingår: Luftningsflaska; Luftningsnyckel; Bromsrörsbockare; Koningsverktyg för bromsrör; Bromsbeläggsspridare; Återställningsverktyg för bromskolv; Bromsoksspridare; Bärväska; Uppsamlingsflaska; Genomskinlig luftningsslang; Bromsfjädertång; Handvakuumpump; Verktyg för hållfjäder; Slangklämmor/avstängningsklämmor; Backventil; Tryckluftningsbehållare; Tryckmätare; Adaptrar för behållarlocket; Återställningsplattor/adaptrar; Universaladapter för behållare; Övrigt
da: Medfølgende komponenter i bremsevedligeholdelsesættet: Udluftningsflaske; Nøgle til udluftningsskrue; Bremserørsbukker; Kraveværktøj til bremserør; Bremseklodsspreder; Værktøj til tilbagespoling af kaliberstempel; Kaliberspreder; Bærekuffert; Opsamlingsflaske; Gennemsigtig udluftningsslange; Fjedertang til tromlebremse; Håndvakuumpumpe; Holdefjederværktøj; Slangeklemmer/afklemningsklemmer; Envejsventil; Trykudluftningstank; Trykmåler; Adaptere til beholderdæksel; Tilbagestillingsplader/-adaptere; Universaladapter til beholder; Andet
pt-PT: Componentes do kit de manutenção dos travões incluídos: Garrafa de purga; Chave de purga; Dobrador de tubos de travão; Ferramenta de abocardamento de tubos de travão; Afastador de calços de travão; Ferramenta de retração do pistão da pinça; Ferramenta afastadora da pinça; Estojo de transporte; Garrafa coletora; Tubo de purga transparente; Alicate para molas de travão de tambor; Bomba de vácuo manual; Ferramenta de mola de retenção; Grampos de tubo/grampos de estrangulamento; Válvula de retenção unidirecional; Depósito de purga sob pressão; Manómetro de pressão; Adaptadores da tampa do depósito; Placas/adaptadores de retração; Adaptador universal para depósito; Outro
hr-HR: Uključene su kompletne komponente za servis kočnica: Boca za odzračivanje; Ključ za odzračni vijak; Alat za savijanje cijevi kočnica; Alat za pertlanje cijevi kočnica; Alat za širenje kočionih pločica; Alat za vraćanje klipa kočione čeljusti; Alat za širenje kočionih čeljusti; Kutija za nošenje; Sabirna boca; Prozirno crijevo za odzračivanje; Kliješta za opruge bubanj kočnica; Ručna vakuum pumpa; Alat za pričvrsne opruge; Stezaljke za cijevi; Nepovratni ventil; Spremnik za odzračivanje pod tlakom; Manometar; Adapteri za čep spremnika; Ploče/adapteri za vraćanje klipa; Univerzalni adapter spremnika; Ostalo